North Carolina, session 2025, HB459.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025,
G.S. 105-153.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-153.7. Individual income tax imposed.
(a) Tax. – A tax is imposed for each taxable year on the North Carolina taxable income
of every individual. The tax shall be levied, collected, and paid annually. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (a1) of this section, the The tax is a percentage four and one-quarter
percent (4.25%) of the taxpayer's North Carolina taxable income computed as follows:income.
Taxable Years Beginning Tax
In 2022 4.99%
In 2023 4.75%
In 2024 4.5%
In 2025 4.25%
After 2025 3.99%.
(a1) Rate Reduction Trigger. – Notwithstanding the tax rates set out in subsection (a) of
this section, if total General Fund revenue in a fiscal year set out below exceeds the trigger
amount indicated for that fiscal year, then the applicable tax rate for the indicated and subsequent
tax years shall be equal to the greater of (i) the prior taxable year's rate decreased by one-half
*H459-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
percentage point (0.50%) or (ii) two and forty-nine hundredths percent (2.49%). For purposes of
this subsection, total General Fund revenue is the amount stated in the final accounting of total
General Fund Reverting Net Tax and Non-Tax Revenues for the fiscal year, as reported by the
Office of State Controller in August following the end of the fiscal year.
Fiscal Year Trigger Amount Taxable Year Beginning
FY 2025-2026 $33,042,000,000 In 2027
FY 2026-2027 $34,100,000,000 In 2028
FY 2027-2028 $34,760,000,000 In 2029
FY 2028-2029 $35,750,000,000 In 2030
FY 2029-2030 $36,510,000,000 In 2031
FY 2030-2031 $38,000,000,000 In 2032
FY 2031-2032 $38,500,000,000 In 2033
FY 2032-2033 $39,000,000,000 In 2034
…."
SECTION 1.(b) Effective for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2029,
G.S. 105-153.7, as amended by subsection (a) of this section, reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-153.7. Individual income tax imposed.
(a) Tax. – A tax is imposed for each taxable year on the North Carolina taxable income
of every individual. The tax shall be levied, collected, and paid annually. The Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (a1) of this section, the tax is four and one-quarter percent (4.25%) of the
taxpayer's North Carolina taxable income.
(a1) Rate Reduction Trigger. – Notwithstanding the tax rate set out in subsection (a) of
this section, if total General Fund revenue in a fiscal year set out below exceeds the trigger
amount indicated for that fiscal year, then the applicable tax rate for the indicated and subsequent
tax years shall be equal to the greater of (i) the prior taxable year's rate decreased by one-half
percentage point (0.50%) or (ii) two and forty-nine hundredths percent (2.49%). For purposes of
this subsection, total General Fund revenue is the amount stated in the final accounting of total
General Fund Reverting Net Tax and Non-Tax Revenues for the fiscal year, as reported by the
Office of State Controller in August following the end of the fiscal year.
Fiscal Year Trigger Amount Taxable Year Beginning
FY 2027-2028 $34,760,000,000 In 2029
FY 2028-2029 $35,750,000,000 In 2030
FY 2029-2030 $36,510,000,000 In 2031
FY 2030-2031 $38,000,000,000 In 2032
FY 2031-2032 $38,500,000,000 In 2033
FY 2032-2033 $39,000,000,000 In 2034
…."
SECTION 2. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 459-First Edition